Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 36 SALES TAX
§ 63-3620C. Promoter sponsored events.

The operator or promoter contracting with persons for participation in a promoter sponsored event, as a prerequisite to renting or leasing space to any person for conducting business as a retailer on any premises owned or controlled by that operator or promoter, shall obtain:

Written evidence that the retailer holds a valid seller’s permit issued pursuant to this chapter or will apply to the state tax commission for a regular or temporary seller’s permit; or

A written statement from the retailer that the retailer is not offering for sale any item that is taxable under this chapter or is otherwise not required to hold a valid seller’s permit.

Such written evidence or statements shall be in such form and contain such information as the state tax commission shall require. The operator or promoter shall submit the documents to the state tax commission within ten (10) days following the beginning of the event.

The state tax commission may appoint a sponsor or promoter as its agent for issuing temporary seller’s permits to participants in the event and for accounting for such permits.
(3)(a) The state tax commission may appoint a sponsor or promoter as its agent for issuing temporary seller’s permits to participants in the event and for accounting for such permits.

A sponsor or promoter appointed to issue temporary permits under this subsection shall be entitled to a credit or refund of income or franchise taxes imposed under chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, in the amount of one dollar ($1.00) for each such temporary permit issued by the sponsor or promoter during the taxable year.

Any operator or promoter of a promoter sponsored event who fails to comply with this section may be subject to a minimum penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) per event and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each seller over two (2) sellers for whom such records required by subsection (1) of this section are not obtained, but not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each such event. Under no circumstances, shall an operator or a promoter be responsible for sales or use tax not remitted by a retailer at a promoter sponsored event.

The penalties provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not apply:

Unless the state tax commission shall have previously given notice to the operator or promoter or its officer, agent or employee, by certified mail, of the requirements of this section and of a violation of this section by the operator or promoter or its officer, agent or employee; or

If the operator or promoter shows that such failure was due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect.

The state tax commission shall give notice of any penalty provided in this section and it shall assess such penalties in the manner provided for deficiencies of tax.

“Promoter sponsored event,” as used in this section, means a swap meet, flea market, gun show, fair or similar activity involving a series of sales sufficient in number, scope and character to constitute a regular course of business; or any event at which two (2) or more persons offer tangible personal property or services for sale or exchange and at which a fee is charged for the privilege of offering the services or displaying the property for sale or exchange; or at which a fee is charged to prospective buyers for admission to the area where the property or services are offered or displayed for sale or exchange.

§ 63-3620E. Collection of tax by marketplace facilitators.

A marketplace facilitator shall register with the state tax commission and collect, report, and pay state sales and use taxes on any retail sale facilitated by the marketplace facilitator. A marketplace facilitator shall not collect, report, or pay any local sales tax or any other tax or assessment that is not imposed by this chapter.

A marketplace facilitator that has physical presence in this state but has not previously facilitated a retail sale in the state of Idaho shall have forty-five (45) days to comply with this section upon completion of the marketplace facilitator’s first facilitated retail sale in Idaho.

A marketplace facilitator that does not have physical presence in this state must comply with this section once the combined total of its own sales and any sales it facilitates for retailers or authorized agents of the retailer exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

A marketplace facilitator is not liable under this section for failure to file, collect, and remit sales and use taxes if the marketplace facilitator demonstrates that the error was due to incorrect or insufficient information given to the marketplace facilitator by the retailer or authorized agent of the retailer. This subsection shall not apply if the marketplace facilitator and the retailer or authorized agent of the retailer are related parties.

No class action on behalf of customers may be brought against a marketplace facilitator in any court of this state that arises from or is in any way related to an overpayment of sales or use tax collected on sales facilitated by the marketplace facilitator, regardless of whether that claim is characterized as a tax refund claim. Nothing in this subsection affects a customer’s right to seek a refund as provided under section 63-3626, Idaho Code.

The state tax commission may waive penalties and interest if a marketplace facilitator seeks liability relief and the state tax commission finds that a reasonable cause exists.

§ 63-3620F. Distribution of tax collected by marketplace facilitators and out-of-state retailers.

State sales and use taxes collected by retailers without a physical presence in Idaho, as described in section 63-3611(3)(h), Idaho Code, and state sales and use taxes collected on transactions facilitated for third-party sellers by marketplace facilitators, as described in section 63-3605E, Idaho Code, shall be distributed as provided in this section.

From June 1, 2019, through June 30, 2024, all state sales and use taxes described in subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed by the state tax commission as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims under this section. All refunds authorized for payment by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state refund account and those moneys are continuously appropriated; and

All remaining funds received pursuant to this section shall be distributed to the tax relief fund established in section 57-811, Idaho Code.

On and after July 1, 2024, all state sales and use taxes described in subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed by the state tax commission as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims under this section. All refunds authorized for payment by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state refund account, and those moneys are continuously appropriated; and

The remaining funds shall be distributed through the distribution formula set forth for other sales and use tax revenue in section 63-3638, Idaho Code, except that the remainder after distribution shall not be paid to the general fund pursuant to section 63-3638(15), Idaho Code, but shall instead be paid to the tax relief fund established in section 57-811, Idaho Code.

Marketplace facilitators must obtain a separate seller’s permit and collect and remit under that separate permit for state sales and use taxes collected on transactions facilitated for third-party sellers.

§ 63-3621. Imposition and rate of the use tax — Exemptions.

An excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property acquired on or after October 1, 2006, for storage, use, or other consumption in this state at the rate of six percent (6%) of the value of the property, and a recent sales price shall be presumptive evidence of the value of the property unless the property is wireless telecommunications equipment, in which case a recent sales price shall be conclusive evidence of the value of the property.

Every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming, in this state, tangible personal property is liable for the tax. His liability is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to this state except that a receipt from a retailer maintaining a place of business in this state or engaged in business in this state given to the purchaser is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability for the tax to which the receipt refers. A retailer shall not be considered to have stored, used or consumed wireless telecommunications equipment by virtue of giving, selling or otherwise transferring such equipment at a discount as an inducement to a consumer to commence or continue a contract for telecommunications service.

Every retailer engaged in business in this state, and making sales of tangible personal property for the storage, use, or other consumption in this state, not exempted under section 63-3622, Idaho Code, shall, at the time of making the sales or, if storage, use or other consumption of the tangible personal property is not then taxable hereunder, at the time the storage, use or other consumption becomes taxable, collect the tax from the purchaser and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the state tax commission.

The provisions of this section shall not apply when the retailer pays sales tax on the transaction and collects reimbursement for such sales tax from the customer.

Every retailer engaged in business in this state or maintaining a place of business in this state shall register with the state tax commission and give the name and address of all agents operating in this state the location of all distributions or sales houses or offices or other places of business in this state and such other information as the state tax commission may require.

For the purpose of the proper administration of this act and to prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it shall be presumed that tangible personal property sold by any person for delivery in this state is sold for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. The burden of proving the sale is tax exempt is upon the person who makes the sale unless he obtains from the purchaser a resale certificate to the effect that the property is purchased for resale or rental. It shall be presumed that sales made to a person who has completed a resale certificate for the seller’s records are not taxable and the seller need not collect sales or use taxes unless the tangible personal property purchased is taxable to the purchaser as a matter of law in the particular instance claimed on the resale certificate.

If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate makes any storage or use of the property other than retention, demonstration or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business, the storage or use is taxable as of the time the property is first so stored or used.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), and each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

It shall be presumed that tangible personal property shipped or brought to this state by the purchaser was purchased from a retailer, for storage, use or other consumption in this state.

It shall be presumed that tangible personal property delivered outside this state to a purchaser known by the retailer to be a resident of this state was purchased from a retailer for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. This presumption may be controverted by evidence satisfactory to the state tax commission that the property was not purchased for storage, use, or other consumption in this state.

When the tangible personal property subject to use tax has been subjected to a general retail sales or use tax by another state of the United States in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of the Idaho tax, and evidence can be given of such payment, the property will not be subject to Idaho use tax. If the amount paid the other state was less, the property will be subject to use tax to the extent that the Idaho tax exceeds the tax paid to the other state. For the purposes of this subsection, a registration certificate or title issued by another state or subdivision thereof for a vehicle or trailer or a vessel as defined in section 67-7003, Idaho Code, shall be sufficient evidence of payment of a general retail sales or use tax.

The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to the use by a nonresident of this state of a motor vehicle which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of his residence and is not used in this state more than a cumulative period of time totaling ninety (90) days in any consecutive twelve (12) months and which is not required to be registered or licensed under the laws of this state. The use tax herein shall also not apply to any use of a motor vehicle which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of residence of a nonresident student while such nonresident student is enrolled as a full-time student in an institution of postsecondary education that is both physically located in Idaho and recognized as accredited by the state board of education.

The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to the use of household goods, personal effects and personally owned vehicles or personally owned aircraft by a resident of this state if such articles were acquired by such person in another state while a resident of that state and primarily for use outside this state and if such use was actual and substantial, but if an article was acquired less than three (3) months prior to the time he entered this state, it will be presumed that the article was acquired for use in this state and that its use outside this state was not actual and substantial. The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to the use of household goods, personal effects and personally owned vehicles or personally owned aircraft by active duty military personnel temporarily assigned in this state and spouses who accompany them if such articles were acquired prior to receipt of orders to transfer to Idaho or three (3) months prior to moving to Idaho, whichever time period is shorter. For purposes of this subsection, “resident” shall be as defined in section 63-3013 or 63-3013A, Idaho Code.
(m) The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to the storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property which is or will be incorporated into real property and which has been donated to and has become the property of:

A nonprofit organization as defined in section 63-3622O, Idaho Code; or

The state of Idaho; or

Any political subdivision of the state.

A seller may accept a resale certificate from a purchaser prior to the time of sale, at the time of sale, or at any reasonable time after the sale when necessary to establish the privilege of the exemption. The resale certificate relieves the person selling the property from the burden of proof only if taken from a person who is engaged in the business of selling or renting tangible personal property and who holds the permit provided for by section 63-3620, Idaho Code, or who is a retailer not engaged in business in this state, and who, at the time of purchasing the tangible personal property, intends to sell or rent it in the regular course of business or is unable to ascertain at the time of purchase whether the property will be sold or will be used for some other purpose. Other than as provided elsewhere in this section, when a resale certificate, properly executed, is presented to the seller, the seller has no duty or obligation to collect sales or use taxes in regard to any sales transaction so documented regardless of whether the purchaser properly or improperly claimed an exemption. A seller so relieved of the obligation to collect tax is also relieved of any liability to the purchaser for failure to collect tax or for making any report or disclosure of information required or permitted under this chapter.
The resale certificate shall bear the name and address of the purchaser, shall be signed by the purchaser or his agent, shall indicate the number of the permit issued to the purchaser, or that the purchaser is an out-of-state retailer, and shall indicate the general character of the tangible personal property sold by the purchaser in the regular course of business. The certificate shall be substantially in such form as the state tax commission may prescribe.

This exemption applies whether the tangible personal property is incorporated in real property by the donee, a contractor or subcontractor of the donee, or any other person.

(n) The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to tastings of food and beverages including, but not limited to, wine and beer. For the purposes of this subsection, a tasting of wine and beer shall be defined as the maximum serving allowed by state or federal laws for such occasions provided to a potential customer, at no charge, at a location where like or similar beverages are sold. For nonalcoholic beverages and food, a tasting shall be defined as a sample from a unit available for sale at the tasting location.

(o) The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to donations of food or beverages, or both, to individuals or nonprofit organizations. For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” means those nonprofit entities currently registered with the secretary of state pursuant to section 30-30-102, Idaho Code.

(p) The use tax herein imposed shall not apply to a retailer supplying prepared food or beverages free of charge to its employee when that retailer sells prepared food or beverages in its normal course of business.

§ 63-3621A. Use tax on transient equipment.

As used in this section, the term “transient equipment” means tangible personal property which is:

Subject to use tax in this state; and

Eligible for depreciation under the federal internal revenue code and actually depreciated on the owner’s federal income tax return; and

Present in this state for a cumulative period of time totaling not more than ninety (90) days in any consecutive twelve (12) months. For purposes of this subsection, any part of a day is one (1) day.

In the case of transient equipment owned and operated by a nonresident of this state, the use tax imposed by section 63-3621, Idaho Code, may be the lesser of the amount of tax computed upon:

The value of the property. A recent sales price shall be presumptive evidence of the value of the property. If there is no recent sales price, the value shall be the fair market value of the property on the date the property is first brought into Idaho; or

The fair rental value of the property during the time the property is located in Idaho. Fair rental value is the amount for which the same or similar property could be leased or rented by the taxpayer from another, unrelated person in the business of leasing or renting such equipment for profit. A taxpayer electing to pay use tax on the fair rental value must establish the value by clear and convincing evidence. Any allowable credit for sales or use taxes paid to another state shall be first exhausted before any tax becomes due under this section.

If transient equipment taxed upon its fair rental value ceases to qualify as transient equipment, it shall be taxed as provided in section 63-3621, Idaho Code, based upon the value at the time the equipment ceased to qualify.

A taxpayer may elect to pay tax on the fair rental value on or before the due date of the first tax return on which the use tax is due. The election need not be filed with the state tax commission but must be reflected in the records supporting the computation of the tax shown to be due on the return. After the due date of the first tax return on which the use tax is due, an election may only be made with the written approval of the state tax commission. The commission shall grant approval only upon evidence establishing that at the time the equipment first became subject to use tax in this state, the taxpayer intended a use for the equipment which would have qualified the property as transient equipment.

Upon discovery of property subject to use tax in this state in regard to which no use tax has been reported, the state tax commission may assert use tax in the manner provided in section 63-3629, Idaho Code, based upon the fair rental value if the commission finds that at the time the equipment first became subject to use tax in this state, the taxpayer intended a use for the equipment which would have qualified the property as transient equipment.

§ 63-3622. Exemptions — Exemption and resale certificates — Penalties.

To prevent evasion of the sales and use tax, it shall be presumed that all sales are subject to the taxes imposed by the provisions of this chapter and the retailer shall have the burden of establishing the facts giving rise to such exemption unless the purchaser delivers to the retailer, or has on file with the retailer, an exemption or resale certificate.

An exemption certificate shall show the purchaser’s name, business name and address (if any), address, and signature and the reason for and nature of the claimed exemption.

A resale certificate shall be signed by and bear the name and address of the purchaser or his agent, shall indicate the number of the permit issued to the purchaser or that the purchaser is an out-of-state retailer, and shall indicate the general character of the tangible personal property sold or rented by the purchaser in the regular course of business. A resale certificate relieves the seller from the burden of proof only if taken from a person who is engaged in the business of selling or renting tangible personal property and who holds a permit provided for in this section, or who is a retailer not engaged in business in this state, and who, at the time of purchasing the tangible personal property, intends to sell or rent it in the regular course of business or is unable to ascertain at the time of purchase whether the property will be sold or will be used for some other purpose. If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate makes any use of the property other than retention, demonstration or display while holding it for sale or rent in the regular course of business, the use shall be taxable to the purchaser as of the time the property is first used by him, and the sales price of the property to him shall be deemed the measure of the tax.

A seller may accept an exemption or resale certificate from a purchaser prior to the time of sale, at the time of the sale, or at any reasonable time after the sale when necessary to establish the privilege of the exemption. Other than as provided elsewhere in this section, when an exemption or resale certificate, properly executed, is presented to or is on file with the seller, the seller has no duty or obligation to collect sales or use taxes in regard to any sales transaction so documented regardless of whether the purchaser properly or improperly claimed an exemption. A seller so relieved of the obligation to collect tax is also relieved of any liability to the purchaser for failure to collect tax or for making any report or disclosure of information required or permitted under this chapter. A seller need not accept an exemption or resale certificate that is not readable, legible or copyable.

Any person who gives an exemption or resale certificate with the intention of evading payment of the amount of the tax applicable to the transaction is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

An exemption or resale certificate shall be substantially in such form as the state tax commission may prescribe. The claim for the exemption may be a part of the documentation on a sales invoice, purchase order, or other documentation retained by the retailer with regard to the sale. Unless the purchaser has an exemption or resale certificate on file with the seller, the purchaser or his agent must sign the exemption claim, which shall be in addition to any other signature which the seller normally requires on sales invoices, purchase orders, or other sales documentation.
(g) It shall be presumed that sales made to a person who has completed an exemption or resale certificate for the seller’s records are not taxable and the seller need not collect sales or use taxes unless the tangible personal property or services purchased are taxable to the purchaser as a matter of law in the particular instance claimed on the exemption certificate.

§ 63-3622A. Prohibited taxes.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale at retail, storage, use or other consumption of tangible personal property or taxable services which this state is prohibited from taxing under the constitution of the United States.

§ 63-3622B. Out-of-state contracts.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale of tangible personal property to contractors for subsequent incorporation into real property outside this state in the performance of a contract to improve the out-of-state realty unless this provision would result in subjection of said contractor to a use or similar excise tax in another state.

§ 63-3622C. Motor fuels subject to tax.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter purchases which are subject to the motor fuels tax imposed by chapter 24, title 63, Idaho Code, and purchases upon which motor fuels taxes have actually been paid and the sale or use of any fuel which is subsequently transported outside the state for use thereafter outside the state. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the imposition of a tax on fuel brought into this state in the fuel tanks of motor vehicles or railroad locomotives in interstate commerce.

§ 63-3622D. Production exemption.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

The sale at retail, storage, use or other consumption in this state of:

Tangible personal property which will enter into and become an ingredient or component part of tangible personal property manufactured, processed, mined, produced or fabricated for sale, including birds, fish or other wildlife that are hunted or fished on property a business owns, controls or has the right to use and where the business collects sales tax for the charges imposed for the hunting or fishing activity, and including the cost of acquiring such birds, fish or other wildlife and the feed, supplies and labor used to raise or maintain such birds, fish or other wildlife.

Tangible personal property primarily and directly used or consumed in or during a manufacturing, processing, mining, farming, fabricating, hunting or fishing operation, including, but not limited to, repair parts, lubricants, hydraulic oil, and coolants, which become a component part of such tangible personal property and including, but not limited to, ammunition, birds, fish or other wildlife; provided that the use or consumption of such tangible personal property is necessary or essential to the performance of such operation.

Chemicals, catalysts, and other materials which are used for the purpose of producing or inducing a chemical or physical change in the product or for removing impurities from the product or otherwise placing the product in a more marketable condition as part of an operation described in subsection (a)(2) of this section, and chemicals and equipment used in clean-in-place systems in the food processing and food manufacturing industries.

Safety equipment and supplies required to meet a safety standard of a state or federal agency when such safety equipment and supplies are used as part of an operation described in subsection (a)(2) of this section.

Plants to be used as part of a farming operation.

Other than as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the exemptions allowed in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3) and (4) of this section are available only to a business or separately operated segment of a business which is primarily devoted to producing tangible personal property which that business will sell and which is intended for ultimate sale at retail within or without this state. A contractor providing services to a business entitled to an exemption under this section is not exempt as to any property owned, leased, rented or used by it unless, as a result of the terms of the contract, the use of the property is exempt under section 63-3615(b), Idaho Code.

The exemptions allowed in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3) and (4) of this section shall also be available to a business, or separately operated segment of a business, engaged in farming or mining, whether as a subcontractor, contractor, contractee or subcontractee, when such business or segment of a business is primarily devoted to producing tangible personal property which is intended for ultimate sale at retail within or without this state, without regard to the ownership of the product being produced; and shall also be available to a business, or separately operated segment of a business, engaged in offering the right to hunt birds or other wildlife or fish on property the business owns, controls or has the right to use, where the charges for such rights are subject to sales tax as provided in this chapter.

The exemptions allowed in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3) and (4) of this section shall also be available to a business, or separately operated segment of a business, engaged in the business of processing materials, substances or commodities for use as fuel for the production of energy, whether as a subcontractor, contractor, contractee or subcontractee, without regard to the ownership of the materials, substances or commodities being processed and irrespective of whether the materials, substances or commodities being processed are intended for ultimate sale at retail within or without this state.

As used in this section, the term “directly used or consumed in or during” a farming operation means the performance of a function reasonably necessary to the operation of the total farming business, including the planting, growing, harvesting, storage and removal from storage of crops and other agricultural products, and movement of crops and produce from the place of harvest to the place of initial storage. It includes disinfectants used in the dairy industry to clean cow udders or to clean pipes, vats or other milking equipment.

The exemptions allowed in this section do not include machinery, equipment, materials and supplies used in a manner that is incidental to the manufacturing, processing, mining, farming or fabricating operations such as maintenance and janitorial equipment and supplies.

Without regard to the use of such property, this section does not exempt:

Tangible personal property used in any activities other than the actual manufacturing, processing, mining, farming, fabricating, hunting or fishing operations, such as office equipment and supplies, and equipment and supplies used in selling or distributing activities.

Property used in transportation activities.

Machinery, equipment, tools or other property used to make repairs. This subsection does not include repair parts that become a component part of tangible property exempt from tax under this section or lubricants, hydraulic oil, or coolants used in the operation of tangible personal property exempt under this section.

Machinery, equipment, tools or other property used to manufacture, fabricate, assemble or install tangible personal property which is:

Not held for resale in the regular course of business; and

Owned by the manufacturer, processor, miner, farmer or fabricator;

Any improvement to real property or fixture thereto or any tangible personal property which becomes or is intended to become a component of any real property or any improvement or fixture thereto.

Motor vehicles and aircraft.

Tangible personal property used or consumed in processing, producing or fabricating tangible personal property exempted from tax under this chapter in sections 63-3622F and 63-3622I, Idaho Code.

Tangible personal property described in section 63-3622HH, Idaho Code.

Any tangible personal property exempt under this section which ceases to qualify for this exemption, and does not qualify for any other exemption or exclusion of the taxes imposed by this chapter, shall be subject to use tax based upon its value at the time it ceases to qualify for exemption. Any tangible personal property taxed under this chapter which later qualifies for this exemption shall not entitle the owner of it to any claim for refund.

provided, however, this subsection does not prevent exemption of machinery, equipment, tools or other property exempted from tax under subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3) of this section.

§ 63-3622E. Containers.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of containers in the following categories:

Nonreturnable containers when sold without the contents to persons who place the contents in the container and sell the contents together with the container.

Containers when sold with the contents if the sales price of the contents is not required to be included in the measure of the taxes imposed by this act.

Returnable containers when sold with the contents in connection with a retail sale of the contents or when resold for filling.

§ 63-3622F. Utilities.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of natural gas, electricity, and water when delivered to consumers at the place of consumption by means of pipes, wires, mains or similar systems.

§ 63-3622G. Heating materials.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of any matter used to produce heat by burning, for the purpose of providing heat to any building or for domestic home use, including wood, coal, petroleum and gas.

§ 63-3622H. Home yard sales. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3622I. Literature.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase, or the storage, use or other consumption of literature, pamphlets, periodicals, tracts and books published and sold by an entity qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code; no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of a private individual or shareholder.

As used in this section, “literature” includes information available in alternative forms, including audio-visual and magnetic, optical or other machine-readable media.

§ 63-3622J. School, church and senior citizen meals.

There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale of meals by public or private schools under the federal school lunch program or under programs that provide nutritional meals for the aging (Title III of the Older Americans Act, P.L. 109-365), and the sale of meals by a church to its members at a church function.